Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Article 3. Medicaid.
Those services must be provided in a long-term care nursing facility dedicated to the care and treatment of persons with severe disabilities.

Physician assistant services. Services furnished by a physician assistant who is licensed by the State Board of Medical Licensure and is practicing with physician supervision under regulations adopted by the board, under regulations adopted by the division. Reimbursement for those services shall not exceed ninety percent (90%) of the reimbursement rate for comparable services rendered by a physician. The division may provide for a reimbursement rate for physician assistant services of up to one hundred percent (100%) or the reimbursement rate for comparable services rendered by a physician for physician assistant services that are provided after the normal working hours of the physician assistant, as determined in accordance with regulations of the division.

The division shall make application to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) for a waiver to develop and provide services for children with serious emotional disturbances as defined in Section 43-14-1(1), which may include home- and community-based services, case management services or managed care services through mental health providers certified by the Department of Mental Health. The division may implement and provide services under this waivered program only if funds for these services are specifically appropriated for this purpose by the Legislature, or if funds are voluntarily provided by affected agencies.

The division may develop and implement disease management programs for individuals with high-cost chronic diseases and conditions, including the use of grants, waivers, demonstrations or other projects as necessary.

Participation in any disease management program implemented under this paragraph (47) is optional with the individual. An individual must affirmatively elect to participate in the disease management program in order to participate, and may elect to discontinue participation in the program at any time.

Pediatric long-term acute care hospital services.

Pediatric long-term acute care hospital services means services provided to eligible persons under twenty-one (21) years of age by a freestanding Medicare-certified hospital that has an average length of inpatient stay greater than twenty-five (25) days and that is primarily engaged in providing chronic or long-term medical care to persons under twenty-one (21) years of age.

The services under this paragraph (48) shall be reimbursed as a separate category of hospital services.

The division shall establish copayments and/or coinsurance for all Medicaid services for which copayments and/or coinsurance are allowable under federal law or regulation .

Services provided by the State Department of Rehabilitation Services for the care and rehabilitation of persons who are deaf and blind, as allowed under waivers from the United States Department of Health and Human Services to provide home- and community-based services using state funds that are provided from the appropriation to the State Department of Rehabilitation Services or if funds are voluntarily provided by another agency.

Upon determination of Medicaid eligibility and in association with annual redetermination of Medicaid eligibility, beneficiaries shall be encouraged to undertake a physical examination that will establish a base-line level of health and identification of a usual and customary source of care (a medical home) to aid utilization of disease management tools. This physical examination and utilization of these disease management tools shall be consistent with current United States Preventive Services Task Force or other recognized authority recommendations.

For persons who are determined ineligible for Medicaid, the division will provide information and direction for accessing medical care and services in the area of their residence.

Notwithstanding any provisions of this article, the division may pay enhanced reimbursement fees related to trauma care, as determined by the division in conjunction with the State Department of Health, using funds appropriated to the State Department of Health for trauma care and services and used to match federal funds under a cooperative agreement between the division and the State Department of Health. The division, in conjunction with the State Department of Health, may use grants, waivers, demonstrations, or other projects as necessary in the development and implementation of this reimbursement program.

Targeted case management services for high-cost beneficiaries may be developed by the division for all services under this section.

[Deleted]

Therapy services. The plan of care for therapy services may be developed to cover a period of treatment for up to six (6) months, but in no event shall the plan of care exceed a six-month period of treatment. The projected period of treatment must be indicated on the initial plan of care and must be updated with each subsequent revised plan of care. Based on medical necessity, the division shall approve certification periods for less than or up to six (6) months, but in no event shall the certification period exceed the period of treatment indicated on the plan of care. The appeal process for any reduction in therapy services shall be consistent with the appeal process in federal regulations.

Prescribed pediatric extended care centers services for medically dependent or technologically dependent children with complex medical conditions that require continual care as prescribed by the child’s attending physician, as determined by the division.

No Medicaid benefit shall restrict coverage for medically appropriate treatment prescribed by a physician and agreed to by a fully informed individual, or if the individual lacks legal capacity to consent by a person who has legal authority to consent on his or her behalf, based on an individual’s diagnosis with a terminal condition. As used in this paragraph (57), “terminal condition” means any aggressive malignancy, chronic end-stage cardiovascular or cerebral vascular disease, or any other disease, illness or condition which a physician diagnoses as terminal.

Treatment services for persons with opioid dependency or other highly addictive substance use disorders. The division is authorized to reimburse eligible providers for treatment of opioid dependency and other highly addictive substance use disorders, as determined by the division. Treatment related to these conditions shall not count against any physician visit limit imposed under this section.

The division shall allow beneficiaries between the ages of ten (10) and eighteen (18) years to receive vaccines through a pharmacy venue.

Beginning in fiscal year 2010 and in fiscal years thereafter, when Medicaid expenditures are projected to exceed funds available for the fiscal year, the division shall submit the expected shortfall information to the PEER Committee not later than December 1 of the year in which the shortfall is projected to occur. PEER shall review the computations of the division and report its findings to the Legislative Budget Office not later than January 7 in any year.

Pay providers at a rate that is less than the Medicaid All Patient Refined Diagnosis Related Groups (APR-DRG) reimbursement rate;

Override the medical decisions of hospital physicians or staff regarding patients admitted to a hospital for an emergency medical condition as defined by 42 US Code Section 1395dd. This restriction (b) does not prohibit the retrospective review of the appropriateness of the determination that an emergency medical condition exists by chart review or coding algorithm, nor does it prohibit prior authorization for nonemergency hospital admissions;

Pay providers at a rate that is less than the normal Medicaid reimbursement rate. It is the intent of the Legislature that all managed care entities described in this subsection (H), in collaboration with the division, develop and implement innovative payment models that incentivize improvements in health care quality, outcomes, or value, as determined by the division. Participation in the provider network of any managed care, coordinated care, provider-sponsored health plan, or similar contractor shall not be conditioned on the provider’s agreement to accept such alternative payment models;

Implement a prior authorization program for prescription drugs that is more stringent than the prior authorization processes used by the division in its administration of the Medicaid program;

[Deleted]

Implement a preferred drug list that is more stringent than the mandatory preferred drug list established by the division under subsection (A)(9) of this section;

Implement a policy which denies beneficiaries with hemophilia access to the federally funded hemophilia treatment centers as part of the Medicaid Managed Care network of providers. All Medicaid beneficiaries with hemophilia shall receive unrestricted access to anti-hemophilia factor products through noncapitated reimbursement programs.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section, no expansion of Medicaid managed care program contracts may be implemented by the division without enabling legislation from the Mississippi Legislature. There is hereby established the Commission on Expanding Medicaid Managed Care to develop a recommendation to the Legislature and the Division of Medicaid relative to authorizing the division to expand Medicaid managed care contracts to include additional categories of Medicaid-eligible beneficiaries, and to study the feasibility of developing an alternative managed care payment model for medically complex children.

The members of the commission shall be as follows:

The Chairmen of the Senate Medicaid Committee and the Senate Appropriations Committee and a member of the Senate appointed by the Lieutenant Governor;

The Chairmen of the House Medicaid Committee and the House Appropriations Committee and a member of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House;

The Executive Director of the Division of Medicaid, Office of the Governor;

The Commissioner of the Mississippi Department of Insurance;

A representative of a hospital that operates in Mississippi, appointed by the Speaker of the House;

A licensed physician appointed by the Lieutenant Governor;

A licensed pharmacist appointed by the Governor;

A licensed mental health professional or alcohol and drug counselor appointed by the Governor;

The Executive Director of the Mississippi State Medical Association (MSMA);

Representatives of each of the current managed care organizations operated in the state appointed by the Governor; and

A representative of the long-term care industry appointed by the Governor.

The commission shall meet within forty-five (45) days of the effective date of this section, upon the call of the Governor, and shall evaluate the Medicaid managed care program. Specifically the commission shall:

Review the program’s financial metrics;

Review the program’s product offerings;

Review the program’s impact on insurance premiums for individuals and small businesses;

Make recommendations for future managed care program modifications;

Determine whether the expansion of the Medicaid managed care program may endanger the access to care by vulnerable patients;

Review the financial feasibility and health outcomes of populations health management as specifically provided in paragraph (2) above;

Make recommendations regarding a pilot program to evaluate an alternative managed care payment model for medically complex children;

The commission may request the assistance of the PEER Committee in making its evaluation; and

The commission shall solicit information from any person or entity the commission deems relevant to its study.

The members of the commission shall elect a chair from among the members. The commission shall develop and report its findings and any recommendations for proposed legislation to the Governor and the Legislature on or before December 1, 2018. A quorum of the membership shall be required to approve any final report and recommendation. Members of the commission shall be reimbursed for necessary travel expense in the same manner as public employees are reimbursed for official duties and members of the Legislature shall be reimbursed in the same manner as for attending out-of-session committee meetings.

Upon making its report, the commission shall be dissolved.

[Deleted]

There shall be no cuts in inpatient and outpatient hospital payments, or allowable days or volumes, as long as the hospital assessment provided in Section 43-13-145 is in effect. This subsection (J) shall not apply to decreases in payments that are a result of: reduced hospital admissions, audits or payments under the APR-DRG or APC models, or a managed care program or similar model described in subsection (H) of this section.

This section shall stand repealed on July 1, 2021.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article to the contrary, the division shall reduce the rate of reimbursement to providers for any service provided under this section by five percent (5%) of the allowed amount for that service. However, the reduction in the reimbursement rates required by this subsection (B) shall not apply to inpatient hospital services, outpatient hospital services, nursing facility services, intermediate care facility services, psychiatric residential treatment facility services, pharmacy services provided under subsection (A)(9) of this section, or any service provided by the University of Mississippi Medical Center or a state agency, a state facility or a public agency that either provides its own state match through intergovernmental transfer or certification of funds to the division, or a service for which the federal government sets the reimbursement methodology and rate. From and after January 1, 2010, the reduction in the reimbursement rates required by this subsection (B) shall not apply to physicians’ services. In addition, the reduction in the reimbursement rates required by this subsection (B) shall not apply to case management services and home-delivered meals provided under the home- and community-based services program for the elderly and disabled by a planning and development district (PDD). Planning and development districts participating in the home- and community-based services program for the elderly and disabled as case management providers shall be reimbursed for case management services at the maximum rate approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS). The Medical Care Advisory Committee established in Section 43-13-107(3)(a) shall develop a study and advise the division with respect to (1) determining the effect of any across-the-board five percent (5%) reduction in the rate of reimbursement to providers authorized under this subsection (B), and (2) comparing provider reimbursement rates to those applicable in other states in order to establish a fair and equitable provider reimbursement structure that encourages participation in the Medicaid program, and (3) comparing dental and orthodontic services reimbursement rates to those applicable in other states in fee-for-service and in managed care programs in order to establish a fair and equitable dental provider reimbursement structure that encourages participation in the Medicaid program, and (4) make a report thereon with any legislative recommendations to the Chairmen of the Senate and House Medicaid Committees prior to January 1, 2019.

The division may pay to those providers who participate in and accept patient referrals from the division’s emergency room redirection program a percentage, as determined by the division, of savings achieved according to the performance measures and reduction of costs required of that program. Federally qualified health centers may participate in the emergency room redirection program, and the division may pay those centers a percentage of any savings to the Medicaid program achieved by the centers’ accepting patient referrals through the program, as provided in this subsection (C).

[Deleted]

Notwithstanding any provision of this article, no new groups or categories of recipients and new types of care and services may be added without enabling legislation from the Mississippi Legislature, except that the division may authorize those changes without enabling legislation when the addition of recipients or services is ordered by a court of proper authority.

The executive director shall keep the Governor advised on a timely basis of the funds available for expenditure and the projected expenditures. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this article, if current or projected expenditures of the division are reasonably anticipated to exceed the amount of funds appropriated to the division for any fiscal year, the Governor, after consultation with the executive director, shall take all appropriate measures to reduce costs, which may include, but are not limited to:

Reducing or discontinuing any or all services that are deemed to be optional under Title XIX of the Social Security Act;

Reducing reimbursement rates for any or all service types;

Imposing additional assessments on health care providers; or

Any additional cost-containment measures deemed appropriate by the Governor.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, it shall be the duty of each provider participating in the Medicaid program to keep and maintain books, documents and other records as prescribed by the Division of Medicaid in substantiation of its cost reports for a period of three (3) years after the date of submission to the Division of Medicaid of an original cost report, or three (3) years after the date of submission to the Division of Medicaid of an amended cost report.

(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the division is authorized to implement (a) a managed care program, (b) a coordinated care program, (c) a coordinated care organization program, (d) a health maintenance organization program, (e) a patient-centered medical home program, (f) an accountable care organization program, (g) provider-sponsored health plan, or (h) any combination of the above programs. Managed care programs, coordinated care programs, coordinated care organization programs, health maintenance organization programs, patient-centered medical home programs, accountable care organization programs, provider-sponsored health plans, or any combination of the above programs or other similar programs implemented by the division under this section shall be limited to the greater of (i) forty-five percent (45%) of the total enrollment of Medicaid beneficiaries, or (ii) the categories of beneficiaries participating in the program as of January 1, 2014, plus the categories of beneficiaries composed primarily of persons younger than nineteen (19) years of age, and the division is authorized to enroll categories of beneficiaries in such program(s) as long as the appropriate limitations are not exceeded in the aggregate. As a condition for the approval of any program under this subsection (H)(1), the division shall require that no program may:

Any contractors providing direct patient care under a managed care program established in this section shall provide to the Legislature and the division statistical data to be shared with provider groups in order to improve patient access, appropriate utilization, cost savings and health outcomes not later than October 1 of each year. The division and the contractors participating in the managed care program, a coordinated care program or a provider-sponsored health plan shall be subject to annual program audits performed by the Office of the State Auditor, the PEER Committee and/or an independent third party that has no existing contractual relationship with the division. Those audits shall determine among other items, the financial benefit to the State of Mississippi of the managed care program, the difference between the premiums paid to the managed care contractors and the payments made by those contractors to health care providers, compliance with performance measures required under the contracts, and whether costs have been contained due to improved health care outcomes. In addition, the audit shall review the most common claim denial codes to determine the reasons for the denials. This audit report shall be considered a public document and shall be posted in its entirety on the division’s website.

All health maintenance organizations, coordinated care organizations, provider-sponsored health plans, or other organizations paid for services on a capitated basis by the division under any managed care program or coordinated care program implemented by the division under this section shall reimburse all providers in those organizations at rates no lower than those provided under this section for beneficiaries who are not participating in those programs.

No health maintenance organization, coordinated care organization, provider-sponsored health plan, or other organization paid for services on a capitated basis by the division under any managed care program or coordinated care program implemented by the division under this section shall require its providers or beneficiaries to use any pharmacy that ships, mails or delivers prescription drugs or legend drugs or devices.

No health maintenance organization, coordinated care organization, provider-sponsored health plan, or other organization paid for services on a capitated basis by the division under any managed care program or coordinated care program implemented by the division under this section shall require its providers to be credentialed by the organization in order to receive reimbursement from the organization, but those organizations shall recognize the credentialing of the providers by the division.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7290-39; Laws, 1969, Ex Sess, ch. 37, § 9; Laws, 1972, ch. 319, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 312, § 2; Laws, 1978, ch. 489, § 2; Laws, 1980, ch. 504; Laws, 1980, ch. 508, § 5; Laws, 1981, ch. 355, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 471; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 48; Laws, 1985, ch. 471; Laws, 1986, ch. 437, § 3; Laws, 1987, ch. 513, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 390; Laws, 1988, ch. 513; Laws, 1989, ch. 527, § 5; Laws, 1990, ch. 548, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 579, § 2; Laws, 1992, ch. 487, § 2; Laws, 1993, ch. 388, § 5; Laws, 1993, ch. 609, § 3; Laws, 1994, ch. 649, § 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 614, § 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 518, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 380, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 587, § 6; Laws, 1998, ch. 377, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 467, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 477, § 2; Laws, 1999, ch. 495, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 593, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 301, § 8; Laws, 2000, ch. 328, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 571, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 305, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 385, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 453, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 594, § 2; Laws, 2002, ch. 304, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 454, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 636B, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 543, § 3; Laws, 2004, ch. 593, § 3; Laws, 2005, ch. 470, § 2; Laws, 2007, ch. 552, § 4; Laws, 2007, ch. 553, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 360, § 2; Laws, 2009, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 118, § 2; Laws, 2010, ch. 476, § 71; Laws, 2012, ch. 524, § 13; Laws, 2012, ch. 530, § 2; Laws, 2013, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 2; Laws, 2014, ch. 488, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 483, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015); Laws, 2018, ch. 440, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018.